Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2415.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6724XS (5) 91 dg/jh S.F. 2415 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 554J.1 Definitions. 1 For purposes of this chapter: 2 1. âArtificial intelligence chatbotâ means a software 3 program or application that uses natural language processing 4 or similar machine-learning techniques to simulate human 5 conversation or generate human-like responses to user input. 6 2. âMental health adviceâ means a statement, recommendation, 7 or response purporting to diagnose, treat, mitigate, or address 8 emotional distress, a psychological disorder, self-harm, 9 suicidal ideation, or another mental health concern. 10 3. âProviderâ means a person that designs, deploys, or 11 operates an artificial intelligence chatbot that is accessible 12 to users in this state. 13 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 554J.2 Prohibited conduct ââ crisis 14 intervention required. 15 1. A provider shall not design or operate an artificial 16 intelligence chatbot in a manner that allows the artificial 17 intelligence chatbot to offer or simulate professional mental 18 health advice. 19 2. An artificial intelligence chatbot shall not represent 20 itself as a licensed professional or offer services that would 21 require licensure under chapter 154B or 154D. 22 3. A provider shall implement reasonable protocols to 23 have the providerâs artificial intelligence chatbot detect 24 expressions of self-harm, suicidal ideation, or emotional 25 distress by users. Upon detection of such expressions, 26 the artificial intelligence chatbot shall refer the user to 27 appropriate crisis services, including but not limited to the 28 national suicide prevention lifeline, the Iowa crisis hotline, 29 or emergency services. 30 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 554J.3 Required disclosures and 31 disclaimers. 32 1. Each artificial intelligence chatbot accessible to 33 a user in this state shall explicitly disclose in clear, 34 conspicuous, and easily understood language that the artificial 35 -1- LSB 6724XS (5) 91 dg/jh 1/ 4 S.F. 2415 intelligence chatbot is artificial intelligence, is not a 1 human, and is not a substitute for professional mental health 2 care. 3 2. A disclosure required under this section shall appear at 4 all of the following times: 5 a. At the beginning of the artificial intelligence chatbotâs 6 interaction with a user prior to providing the user with a 7 response to user input. 8 b. At regular intervals during a userâs continuous 9 interaction with the artificial intelligence chatbot. 10 c. When the artificial intelligence chatbot generates a 11 response related to emotional well-being, mental health, or 12 self-harm. 13 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 554J.4 Enforcement and penalties. 14 1. The attorney general shall have authority to enforce this 15 chapter. 16 2. A violation of this chapter is an unfair practice under 17 section 714.16. 18 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 554J.5 Limitations. 19 This chapter shall not be construed to impose liability on 20 an educational institution or a library solely for providing 21 access to general-use software or the internet. 22 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 554J.6 Rulemaking authority. 23 The department of health and human services, in consultation 24 with the chief information officer of the department of 25 management, shall adopt rules to implement this chapter. Rules 26 shall include but not be limited to all of the following: 27 1. Standards for detection protocols for self-harm, 28 suicidal ideation, and emotional distress. 29 2. Acceptable formats for providing disclosures under 30 section 554J.3. 31 3. Safe use guidelines for artificial intelligence chatbot 32 technologies. 33 Sec. 7. Section 714.16, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 34 by adding the following new paragraph: 35 -2- LSB 6724XS (5) 91 dg/jh 2/ 4 S.F. 2415 NEW PARAGRAPH . t. It is an unlawful practice for a person 1 to violate chapter 554J. 2